en: Semi-milled Camargue rices
fr: Riz de Camargue semi-complet

en: Carnaroli rices
de: Carnaroli Reis
es: Arroces Carnaroli
fr: Riz Carnaroli
hr: Carnaroli riža
it: Riso Carnaroli, Risi carnaroli
nl: Carnarolirijsten, Carnarolirijst

en: Calrose rices
fr: Riz Calrose

en: Jasmine rice
de: Jasmin Reis
es: Arroces Jazmín
fi: jasmiiniriisi
fr: Riz thaï, Riz Jasmin, Riz thaï cru
hr: Jasmin riža
it: Riso Jasmine
ja: ジャスミンライス, ジャスミン米
lt: Jasmine ryžiai
nl: Thaise rijsten, Jasmijnrijsten, Pandan, Pandanrijsten

en: Semi-milled Jasmine rices
es: Arroz Jazmín semi-integral, Arroces Jazmín semi-integrales
fr: Riz thaï semi-complet
hr: Polumljevene riže jasmina

en: Brown Jasmine rices, Whole grain Jasmine rices
de: Brauner Jasmin Reis
es: Arroces Jazmín integrales, Arroz Jazmín integral
fr: Riz thaï complet, Riz jasmin complet, Riz thaï noir
hr: Smeđa riža od jasmina
nl: Zwarte thaise rijsten, Zwarte thaise rijst

en: White Jasmine rices
de: Weißer Jasmin Reis
es: Arroces Jazmín blancos
fr: Riz thaï blanc
hr: Bijela riža jasmina
nl: Witte thaise rijsten, Witte thaise rijst

en: Koshihikari rices, Koshihikari
de: Koshihikari Reis
es: Arroces Koshihikari, Koshihikari
fr: Riz Koshihikari, Koshihikari
hr: Koshihikari riža
ja: コシヒカリ
nl: Koshihikaririjsten, Koshihikaririjst

en: Sénia rices, Senia rices
es: Arroces Sénia
fr: Riz Sénia
hr: Sénia riže
nl: Séniarijsten, Séniarijst, Sénia-rijst, Sénia rijst

en: Surinam rices
es: Arroces de Surinam
fr: Riz Surinam
hr: Surinamske riže
nl: Surinaamse rijsten, Surinaamse rijst

en: Tahibonet rices
es: Arroces Tahibonet
fr: Riz Tahibonet
hr: Tahibonet riže
nl: Tahibonetrijsten, Tahibonetrijst, Tahibonet-rijst, Tahibonet rijst

en: Patna rices
fr: Riz Patna

en: Osmancik rices
fr: Riz Osmancik

en: Parmal rices
fr: Riz Parmal

en: Vialone Nano rices
de: Vialone Reis
es: Arroces Vialone Nano
fr: Riz Vialone Nano
hr: Vialone nano riža
it: Riso Vialone Nano
nl: Vialone Nanorijsten, Vialone Nanorijst, Vialone Nano rijst

en: Baldo rices
bg: Ориз Балдо
fr: Riz baldo
hr: Baldo riža
it: Riso baldo

en: Roma rices
fr: Riz Roma
hr: Romske riže
it: Riso Roma

en: Originario rices
fr: Riz Originario
hr: Originario riža
it: Riso Originario

en: Ribe rices
fr: Riz Ribe
hr: Ribana riža
it: Riso Ribe

en: Mixed rices, Mix of rice species
de: Gemischter Reis
es: Mezclas de arroces, Mezcla de arroces
fi: Riisisekoitukset
fr: Mélanges de riz, Riz mélange de variétés
hr: Miješane riže
lt: Įvairūs ryžiai
nl: Gemengde rijsten, Rijstmelanges, Gemengde rijst, Rijstmelange